Illinois, session 104th, SB405.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-22.24b as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.24b)7    Sec. 10-22.24b. School counseling services. School 8counseling services in public schools may be provided by 9school counselors as defined in Section 10-22.24a of this Code 10or by individuals who hold a Professional Educator License 11with a school support personnel endorsement in the area of 12school counseling under Section 21B-25 of this Code. School 13counseling services provided under this Section shall address 14the needs of all students, regardless of citizenship status. 15    School counseling services may include, but are not 16limited to:17        (1) designing and delivering a comprehensive school 18    counseling program through a standards-based, 19    data-informed program that promotes student achievement 20    and wellness;21        (2) (blank);22        (3) school counselors working as culturally skilled 23    professionals who act sensitively to promote social   SB0405 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06642 HLH 16678 b1    justice and equity in a pluralistic society;2        (4) providing individual and group counseling;3        (5) providing a core counseling curriculum that serves 4    all students and addresses the knowledge and skills 5    appropriate to their developmental level through a 6    collaborative model of delivery involving the school 7    counselor, classroom teachers, and other appropriate 8    education professionals, and including prevention and 9    pre-referral activities;10        (6) making referrals when necessary to appropriate 11    offices or outside agencies;12        (7) providing college and career development 13    activities and counseling;14        (8) developing individual career plans with students, 15    which includes planning for post-secondary education, as 16    appropriate, and engaging in related and relevant career 17    and technical education coursework in high school;18        (9) assisting all students with a college or 19    post-secondary education plan, which must include a 20    discussion on all post-secondary education options, 21    including 4-year colleges or universities, community 22    colleges, and vocational schools, and includes planning 23    for post-secondary education, as appropriate, and engaging 24    in related and relevant career and technical education 25    coursework in high school;26        (10) (blank);  SB0405 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06642 HLH 16678 b1        (11) educating all students on scholarships, financial 2    aid, and preparation of the Federal Application for 3    Federal Student Aid;4        (12) collaborating with institutions of higher 5    education and local community colleges so that students 6    understand post-secondary education options and are ready 7    to transition successfully;8        (13) providing crisis intervention and contributing to 9    the development of a specific crisis plan within the 10    school setting in collaboration with multiple 11    stakeholders;12        (14) providing educational opportunities for students, 13    teachers, and parents on mental health issues;14        (15) providing counseling and other resources to 15    students who are in crisis;16        (16) working to address barriers that prohibit or 17    limit access to mental health services;18        (17) addressing bullying and conflict resolution with 19    all students;20        (18) teaching communication skills and helping 21    students develop positive relationships;22        (19) using culturally sensitive skills in working with 23    all students to promote wellness;24        (20) working to address the needs of all students with 25    regard to citizenship status;26        (21) (blank);;  SB0405 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06642 HLH 16678 b1        (22) providing academic, social-emotional, and college 2    and career supports to all students irrespective of 3    special education or Section 504 status;4        (23) assisting students in goal setting and success 5    skills for classroom behavior, study skills, test 6    preparation, internal motivation, and intrinsic rewards;7        (24) (blank);;8        (25) providing information for all students in the 9    selection of courses that will lead to post-secondary 10    education opportunities toward a successful career;11        (26) interpreting achievement test results and guiding 12    students in appropriate directions;13        (27) (blank);14        (28) providing families with opportunities for 15    education and counseling as appropriate in relation to the 16    student's educational assessment;17        (29) consulting and collaborating with teachers and 18    other school personnel regarding behavior management and 19    intervention plans and inclusion in support of students;20        (30) teaming and partnering with staff, parents, 21    businesses, and community organizations to support student 22    achievement and social-emotional learning standards for 23    all students;24        (31) developing and implementing school-based 25    prevention programs, including, but not limited to, 26    mediation and violence prevention, implementing social and   SB0405 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06642 HLH 16678 b1    emotional education programs and services, and 2    establishing and implementing bullying prevention and 3    intervention programs;4        (32) developing culturally sensitive assessment 5    instruments for measuring school counseling prevention and 6    intervention effectiveness and collecting, analyzing, and 7    interpreting data;8        (33) participating on school and district committees 9    to advocate for student programs and resources, as well as 10    establishing a school counseling advisory council that 11    includes representatives of key stakeholders selected to 12    review and advise on the implementation of the school 13    counseling program;14        (34) acting as a liaison between the public schools 15    and community resources and building relationships with 16    important stakeholders, such as families, administrators, 17    teachers, and board members;18        (35) maintaining organized, clear, and useful records 19    in a confidential manner consistent with Section 5 of the 20    Illinois School Student Records Act, the Family 21    Educational Rights and Privacy Act, and the Health 22    Insurance Portability and Accountability Act;23        (36) presenting an annual agreement to the 24    administration, including a formal discussion of the 25    alignment of school and school counseling program missions 26    and goals and detailing specific school counselor   SB0405 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06642 HLH 16678 b1    responsibilities;2        (37) identifying and implementing culturally sensitive 3    measures of success for student competencies in each of 4    the 3 domains of academic, social and emotional, and 5    college and career learning based on planned and periodic 6    assessment of the comprehensive developmental school 7    counseling program;8        (38) collaborating as a team member in Multi-Tiered 9    Systems of Support and other school initiatives;10        (39) conducting observations and participating in 11    recommendations or interventions regarding the placement 12    of children in educational programs or special education 13    classes;14        (40) analyzing data and results of school counseling 15    program assessments, including curriculum, small-group, 16    and closing-the-gap results reports, and designing 17    strategies to continue to improve program effectiveness;18        (41) analyzing data and results of school counselor 19    competency assessments;20        (42) following American School Counselor Association 21    Ethical Standards for School Counselors to demonstrate 22    high standards of integrity, leadership, and 23    professionalism;24        (43) using student competencies to assess student 25    growth and development to inform decisions regarding 26    strategies, activities, and services that help students   SB0405 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06642 HLH 16678 b1    achieve the highest academic level possible;2        (44) practicing as a culturally skilled school 3    counselor by infusing the multicultural competencies 4    within the role of the school counselor, including the 5    practice of culturally sensitive attitudes and beliefs, 6    knowledge, and skills;7        (45) infusing the Social-Emotional Standards, as 8    presented in the State Board of Education standards, 9    across the curriculum and in the counselor's role in ways 10    that empower and enable students to achieve academic 11    success across all grade levels;12        (46) providing services only in areas in which the 13    school counselor has appropriate training or expertise, as 14    well as only providing counseling or consulting services 15    within his or her employment to any student in the 16    district or districts which employ such school counselor, 17    in accordance with professional ethics;18        (47) having adequate training in supervision knowledge 19    and skills in order to supervise school counseling interns 20    enrolled in graduate school counselor preparation programs 21    that meet the standards established by the State Board of 22    Education;23        (48) being involved with State and national 24    professional associations;25        (49) complete the required training as outlined in 26    Section 10-22.39;  SB0405 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06642 HLH 16678 b1        (50) (blank);2        (51) (blank);3        (52) (blank);4        (53) (blank); 5        (54) (blank); and6        (55) promoting career and technical education by 7    assisting each student to determine an appropriate 8    postsecondary plan based upon the student's skills, 9    strengths, and goals and assisting the student to 10    implement the best practices that improve career or 11    workforce readiness after high school. 12    School districts may employ a sufficient number of school 13counselors to maintain the national and State recommended 14student-counselor ratio of 250 to 1. School districts may have 15school counselors spend at least 80% of his or her work time in 16direct contact with students.17    Nothing in this Section prohibits other qualified 18professionals, including other endorsed school support 19personnel, from providing the services listed in this Section.20(Source: P.A. 102-876, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 21103-542, eff. 7-1-24 (see Section 905 of P.A. 103-563 for 22effective date of P.A. 103-542; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24; revised 2310-21-24.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.